South Dakota, session 2026, HB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-9-25 be AMENDED:
11-9-25. Positive Except as provided in this section, positive tax increments of a
district shall must be allocated to the municipality political subdivision that created the
district for each year from the date when the district is created until the municipality
political subdivision has been reimbursed for expenditures previously made, has paid all
monetary obligations, and has retired all outstanding tax increment bonds. However, in
no event may the The positive tax increments may not be allocated longer than twenty
years after the calendar year of the district's creation.
A county may withhold, from positive tax increments of a district created by a
municipality, an amount no greater than the cost incurred by the county in administering
the district.
Section 2. That § 11-9-31 be AMENDED:
11-9-31. The county treasurer or municipal finance officer, as applicable, shall
deposit all remaining tax increments received in a district into a special fund for the
district, after deducting an amount equal to the cost incurred by the county in
administering the district.
The county treasurer or municipal finance officer, as applicable, may deposit
additional moneys into the fund pursuant to an appropriation by the governing body.
Subject to any agreement with bondholders, moneys in the fund may be temporarily
invested in the same manner as other funds of the political subdivision.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.